hfst/verb-som-lex.txt
! Note
! Since the verbs are prefixing, we direct to 
! verb-grm-morph.txt first, ahd then here

! TODO: clean up morphophonology notes.

! TODO: need to organize definitions a bit more wrt. verbal particles.
!       ideally dictionary entries could be compiled directly from lexc files

! NOTE: Following nouns, morphophonology will be marked such
!
!		Final vowels which are deleted or change are marked {o}, {e}, etc.
!		Leave in unchanged form, e.g.:
!			joogso:joogs{o}
!			samee:same{e}
!
!		Medial vowels which are alternatively deleted in certain contexts
!		Are currently marked %^a %^o, etc. Perhaps sometime we can merge these.
! 		
!		final alternations with n/m need to be marked. *-m is always turned to
!		-n, but not all words that end in -n have -m- intervocalically.
!			san:sam
!

! NOTE: The infinitive form is not the recitation form found in Orwin, so I'm 
!		going with that.


! TODO: %^a, %^e, etc., vowel alternations
! TODO: {d} in V3B
	! @P.NEG.ON@:nda@P.NEG.ON@ conjugationclasses ;
	!                         conjugationclasses ;

! TODO: need to make sure there's consistency between the irregular verbs and the regular verbs as far as tagging is concerned. 

LEXICON Verb
	Copulas ;
	prefixing ;  	! TODO: prefixing verbs
	suffixing ; 

LEXICON Copulas
	Ah ; 
	MA ; 


! TODO: negation. Is this a V, or should it be ma+Neg#
!		or is maayaan structurally diff from muu, ma + ah + yaan ?
LEXICON MA
	ma+V+Neg+Pres+Sg3M:muu FINAL ; ! múu ? 
	ma+V+Neg+Pres+Pl3:maayaan FINAL ; !máayáan
	

LEXICON Ah
	Ah_Pres ; 
	Ah_Past ; 

LEXICON Ah_Pres
	ah+V+Inf:ah			# ;
	ah+V+Pres+Sg1:ahay	  	  # ; 
	ah+V+Pres+Sg2:tahay        # ; 
	ah+V+Pres+Sg3Masc:yahay    # ; 
	ah+V+Pres+Sg3Fem:tahay     # ;
	
	ah+V+Pres+Pl1Incl:nahay     # ;
	ah+V+Pres+Pl1Excl:nahay     # ;
	ah+V+Pres+Pl2:tihiin	   # ; 
	ah+V+Pres+Pl3:yihiin       # ; 


LEXICON Ah_Past
	ah+V+Past+Sg1:ahaa	  	  # ; 
	ah+V+Past+Sg2:ahayd        # ; 
	ah+V+Past+Sg3Masc:ahaa    # ; 
	ah+V+Past+Sg3Fem:ahayd     # ;
	
	ah+V+Past+Pl1Incl:ahayn     # ;
	ah+V+Past+Pl1Excl:ahayn     # ;
	ah+V+Past+Pl2:ahaydeen	   # ; 
	ah+V+Past+Pl3:ahaayeen       # ;

LEXICON prefixing
	iman+V:		IMAN "come" ;
	aqoon+V:	AQOON "know, recognize" ; 
	odhan+V:	ODHAN "say" ;
	! TODO: ah is one of these verbs


LEXICON AQOON
	+Inf:aqoon FINAL ; ! aqoón ! check inf form
	+Ind+Past:	AQOON/GenPast ;
	+Ind+Past:  AQOON/GenPastRed ; ! +Red tag after
	+Neg+Past:	AQOON/GenPastNeg ;
	
	+Ind+Pres:	AQOON/GenPres ;
	+Ind+Pres:	AQOON/GenPresRed ; ! +Red tag after
	+Neg+Pres:	AQOON/GenPresNeg ;
	
	+Ind+Pres:	AQOON/GenPresAlt ;
	+Ind+Pres:	AQOON/GenPresRedAlt ; ! +Red tag after
	
	+Imp:		AQOON/Imp ;
	
	! Barrier and @PREFIXING@ necessary for Prog.
	:aqoon{#}@PREFIXING@		Progressive ; ! imán ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
	+Neg+Prog+Pres:oqoon 			FINAL ;		! oqoón
	+Neg+Prog+Past:oqoonaynin		FINAL ; 	! oqoonaynín


! Following lexicons only have Person, Reduced and Sty tags.
LEXICON AQOON/GenPast
	  +1Sg:iqiin			FINAL ;
	 +2Sg:tiqiin			FINAL ;
	+3SgM:yiqiin			FINAL ;
	+3SgF:tiqiin			FINAL ;
	 +1Pl:niqiin			FINAL ;
	+2Pl:tiqiinneen		FINAL ;
	+3Pl:yiqiinneen		FINAL ;

LEXICON AQOON/GenPastRed
	  +1Sg+Red:iqiín			FINAL ; !  iqiín
	 +2Sg+Red:yiqiín			FINAL ; ! yiqiín
	+3SgM+Red:yiqiín			FINAL ; ! yiqiín
	+3SgF+Red:tiqiín			FINAL ; ! tiqiín
	 +1Pl+Red:niqiín			FINAL ; ! niqiín
	+2Pl+Red:yiqiín			FINAL ; ! yiqiín
	+3Pl+Red:yiqiín			FINAL ; ! yiqiín

LEXICON AQOON/GenPastNeg
	+Sg:oqoón               FINAL ; ! oqoón
	+Pl:oqoonín             FINAL ; ! oqoonín
	+Sg+Sty/TODO:aqoón      FINAL ; ! aqoón
	+Pl+Sty/TODO:aqoonín	FINAL ; ! aqoonín

LEXICON AQOON/GenPres
	  +1Sg:aqaan			FINAL ;
	 +2Sg:taqaan			FINAL ;
	+3SgM:yaqaan			FINAL ;
	+3SgF:taqaan			FINAL ;
	 +1Pl:naqaan			FINAL ;
	+2Pl:taqaanniin		FINAL ;
	+3Pl:yaqaanniin		FINAL ;

LEXICON AQOON/GenPresRed
	  +1Sg+Red:aqaán			FINAL ; 	!  aqaán
	 +2Sg+Red:yaqaán			FINAL ; 	! yaqaán
	+3SgM+Red:yaqaán			FINAL ; 	! yaqaán
	+3SgF+Red:taqaán			FINAL ; 	! taqaán
	 +1Pl+Red:naqaán			FINAL ; 	! naqaán
	+2Pl+Red:yaqaán			FINAL ; 	! yaqaán
	+3Pl+Red:yaqaán			FINAL ; 	! yaqaán

LEXICON AQOON/GenPresNeg
	  +1Sg:aqaán			FINAL ;     !  aqaán
	 +2Sg:taqaán			FINAL ;     ! taqaán
	+3SgM:yaqaán			FINAL ;     ! yaqaán
	+3SgF:taqaán			FINAL ;     ! taqaán
	 +1Pl:naqaán			FINAL ;     ! naqaán
	+2Pl:taqaanníin		FINAL ;     ! taqaanníin
	+3Pl:yaqaanníin		FINAL ;     ! yaqaanníin

LEXICON AQOON/GenPresAlt
	  +1Sg+Sty/TODO:aqaannaa			FINAL ;
	 +2Sg+Sty/TODO:taqaannaa			FINAL ;
	+3SgM+Sty/TODO:yaqaannaa			FINAL ;
	+3SgF+Sty/TODO:taqaannaa			FINAL ;
	 +1Pl+Sty/TODO:naqaannaa			FINAL ;
	+2Pl+Sty/TODO:taqaanniin			FINAL ;
	+3Pl+Sty/TODO:yaqaanniin			FINAL ;

LEXICON AQOON/GenPresRedAlt
	  +1Sg+Red+Sty/TODO:aqaanná			FINAL ; 	!  aqaanná
	 +2Sg+Red+Sty/TODO:yaqaanná			FINAL ; 	! yaqaanná
	+3SgM+Red+Sty/TODO:yaqaanná			FINAL ; 	! yaqaanná
	+3SgF+Red+Sty/TODO:taqaanná			FINAL ; 	! taqaanná
	 +1Pl+Red+Sty/TODO:naqaanná			FINAL ; 	! naqaanná
	+2Pl+Red+Sty/TODO:yaqaanná			FINAL ; 	! yaqaanná
	+3Pl+Red+Sty/TODO:yaqaanná			FINAL ; 	! yaqaanná

LEXICON AQOON/Imp
	+Sg:oqóow		FINAL ;		! oqóow
	+Pl:oqoóda		FINAL ;		! oqoóda
	
	+Neg+Sg:óqoon	FINAL ;		! óqoon
	+Neg+Sg:óqoonin	FINAL ;		! óqoonin
	+Neg+Pl:óqoonina FINAL ; 	! oqoonína



LEXICON IMAN
	+Inf:imán	FINAL ; ! imán
	+Ind+Past:	IMAN/GenPast ;
	+Ind+Past:  IMAN/GenPastRed ; ! +Red tag after
	+Neg+Past:	IMAN/GenPastNeg ;
	
	+Ind+Pres:	IMAN/GenPres ;
	+Ind+Pres:	IMAN/GenPresRed ; ! +Red tag after
	+Neg+Pres:	IMAN/GenPresNeg ;
        
	+Imp:		IMAN/Imp ;
	
	! Barrier and @PREFIXING@ necessary for Prog.
	:iman{#}@PREFIXING@		Progressive ; ! imán ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
	+Neg+Prog+Pres:iman 			FINAL ;		! imán
	+Neg+Prog+Past:imanayn		FINAL ; 	! imánaýn
	+Neg+Prog+Past:imanaynin		FINAL ; 	! imánaynín


! Following lexicons only have Person, Reduced and Sty tags.
LEXICON IMAN/GenPast
	  +1Sg:imi				IMAN/ALT ;
	 +2Sg:timi				IMAN/ALT ;
	+3SgM:yimi				IMAN/ALT ;
	+3SgF:timi				IMAN/ALT ;
	 +1Pl:nimi				IMAN/ALT ;
	+2Pl:timaaddeen		FINAL ;
	+3Pl:yimaaddeen		FINAL ;

LEXICON IMAN/GenPastRed
	  +1Sg+Red:imi			IMAN/ALT ; ! 	 imí	/	 imíd
	 +2Sg+Red:yimi			IMAN/ALT ; ! 	yimí	/	yimíd
	+3SgM+Red:yimi			IMAN/ALT ; ! 	yimí	/	yimíd
	+3SgF+Red:timi			IMAN/ALT ; ! 	timí	/	timíd
	 +1Pl+Red:nimi			IMAN/ALT ; ! 	nimí	/	nimíd
	+2Pl+Red:yimi			IMAN/ALT ; ! 	yimí	/	yimíd
	+3Pl+Red:yimi			IMAN/ALT ; ! 	yimí	/	yimíd

LEXICON IMAN/GenPastNeg
	+Sg:iman               FINAL ; ! imán
	+Pl:imanin             FINAL ; ! imanín

LEXICON IMAN/GenPres
	  +1Sg:imaaddaa			FINAL ;
	 +2Sg:timaaddaa			FINAL ;
	+3SgM:yimaaddaa			FINAL ;
	+3SgF:timaaddaa			FINAL ;
	 +1Pl:nimaaddaa			FINAL ;
	+2Pl:timaaddaan		FINAL ;
	+3Pl:yimaaddaan		FINAL ;

LEXICON IMAN/GenPresRed
	  +1Sg+Red:imaadda			FINAL ; 	! 	 imaaddá
	 +2Sg+Red:yimaadda			FINAL ; 	! 	yimaaddá
	+3SgM+Red:yimaadda			FINAL ; 	! 	yimaaddá
	+3SgF+Red:timaadda			FINAL ; 	! 	timaaddá
	 +1Pl+Red:nimaadda			FINAL ; 	! 	nimaadná
	+2Pl+Red:yimaadda			FINAL ; 	! 	yimaaddá
	+3Pl+Red:yimaadda			FINAL ; 	! 	yimaaddá

LEXICON IMAN/GenPresNeg
	  +1Sg:imaaddo			FINAL ;     !  imaaddó  
	 +2Sg:timaaddo			FINAL ;     ! timaaddó  
	+3SgM:yimaaddo			FINAL ;     ! yimaaddó  
	+3SgF:timaaddo			FINAL ;     ! timaaddó  
	 +1Pl:nimaaddo			FINAL ;     ! nimaadnó  
	+2Pl:timaaddaan		FINAL ;     ! timaaddáan
	+3Pl:yimaaddaan		FINAL ;     ! yimaaddáan

LEXICON IMAN/Imp
	+Sg:kaalay		FINAL ;		! kaálay
	+Pl:kaalaya		FINAL ; 	! kaaláya
	
	+Neg+Sg:iman	FINAL ;     ! íman
	+Neg+Sg:imanin	FINAL ;     ! ímanin
	+Neg+Pl:imanína FINAL ; 	! imanína

LEXICON IMAN/ALT
	+Sty/TODO:d		FINAL ;
	:0				FINAL ; 



! TODO: odhan needs alternate -r- forms with +Sty/TODO
